Hawaii statutes.
§651-13 Attached property; sale of. If
any of the property attached is perishable, or in danger of serious and
immediate waste or decay, the police officer shall sell the same in the manner
in which property is sold on execution. Whenever it is made to appear
satisfactorily to the court or judge that the interest of the parties to the
action will be subserved by a sale of any attached property, the court or judge
may order the property to be sold in the same manner as like property sold
under execution. The order shall be made only upon notice to the adverse party
or the adverse party's attorney in case such party has been personally served
with a summons in the action. [L 1905, c 84, §13; RL 1925, §2817; RL 1935,
§4202; RL 1945, §10153; RL 1955, §233-13; HRS §651-13; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next